Maine, session 132, LD1798.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 30-A MRSA §5681, sub-§4-A, as enacted by PL 1999, c. 731, Pt. U, §4, is
amended to read:
4-A. Distribution of Local Government Fund; additional distribution for
property tax limits for senior residents. The Treasurer of State shall transfer the balance
in the Local Government Fund on the 20th day of each month. Money in the Local
Government Fund must be distributed to each municipality in proportion to the product of
the population of the municipality multiplied by the property tax burden of the
municipality.
A. Money in the Local Government Fund must be distributed to each municipality in
proportion to the product of the population of the municipality multiplied by the
property tax burden of the municipality.
B. Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, in addition to the amount
distributed to a municipality pursuant to paragraph A, a municipality is entitled to an
additional distribution of 20% of the amount that municipality is eligible for pursuant
to paragraph A if that municipality has adopted and implemented a program to impose
limits of increases of no more than 2% annually on the imposition of property taxes on
residents who are at least 65 years of age and who qualify for the Maine resident
homestead property tax exemption pursuant to Title 36, chapter 105, subchapter 4-B.